Utah statutes.
51-2a-203.   Audit reports -- Preservation.
(1)  The governing body of each political subdivision and each interlocal
organization or other local entity required to submit an accounting report
shall:
(a)  file and preserve all accounting reports; and
(b)  file copies of all accounting reports with the state auditor.
(2)  Copies of the accounting reports are open to inspection during regular
office hours by any interested persons, where the accounting reports are
filed.
(3)  The state auditor shall have access to all accounting report work papers
created under this chapter.
